en: Locks & Keys
xx: Locks & Keys
cs: Zámky a klíče
da: Låse og nøgler
de: Schlösser & Schlüssel
es: Llaves y cerrojos
fr: Serrures et clés
it: Serrature e chiavi
ja: 鍵
nl: Sloten en sleutels
no: Låser og nøkler
pl: Zamki i klucze
pt: Cadeados e chaves
ru: Замки и ключи
sv: Lås och låssmideri
tr: Kilitler ve Anahtarlar

en: Key Blanks
xx: Key Blanks
cs: Profily klíčů
da: Utilfilede nøgler
de: Schlüsselrohlinge
es: Llaves vírgenes
fr: Clés brutes
it: Chiavi per duplicati
ja: ブランクキー
nl: Sleutelblanken
no: Nøkkelemner
pl: Surówki kluczy
pt: Chaves em bruto
ru: Заготовки для ключей
sv: Nyckelämnen
tr: Ham Anahtarlar

en: Key Caps
xx: Key Caps
cs: Rozlišovače na klíče
da: Nøglehætter
de: Schlüsselkappen
es: Cubrellaves
fr: Coques de clé
it: Cappucci per chiavi
ja: キーキャップ
nl: Sleutelhoesjes
no: Nøkkelhetter
pl: Nasadki na klucze
pt: Capas para chaves
ru: Накладки для ключей
sv: Nyckelmarkörer
tr: Anahtar Başlıkları

en: Key Card Entry Systems
xx: Key Card Entry Systems
cs: Vstupní systémy na kartu
da: Kortadgangssystemer
de: Kartenschließsysteme
es: Sistemas de admisión de tarjeta de acceso
fr: Systèmes d'accès par carte
it: Sistemi ingresso con chiave magnetica
ja: カードキーシステム
nl: Toegangssystemen met sleutelkaart
no: Adgangssystemer med nøkkelkort
pl: Systemy kart wejściowych
pt: Sistemas de fechadura com cartão
ru: Системы доступа с картой-ключом
sv: Passerkortssystem
tr: Kartlı Giriş Sistemleri

en: Locks & Latches
xx: Locks & Latches
cs: Zámky a závory
da: Låse og klinker
de: Schlösser & Riegel
es: Candados y pestillos
fr: Verrous et loquets
it: Lucchetti e chiavistelli
ja: 錠・掛金
nl: Sloten en grendels
no: Låser og reiler
pl: Blokady i zasuwki
pt: Fechaduras e trincos
ru: Замки и защёлки
sv: Lås och hakar
tr: Kilitler ve Mandallar

en: Plumbing
xx: Plumbing
cs: Vodoinstalace
da: Sanitet
de: Küchen- und Sanitärinstallationen
es: Fontanería
fr: Plomberie
it: Prodotti idraulici
ja: 水道設備
nl: Loodgieterswerk
no: Rør og sanitær
pl: Hydraulika
pt: Encanamento
ru: Товары для систем водоснабжения и канализации
sv: Rörmokeri
tr: Sıhhi Tesisat

en: Plumbing Fittings & Supports
xx: Plumbing Fittings & Supports
cs: Vodovodní armatury
da: Rørstykker
de: Rohrverbindungsstücke & -halterungen
es: Accesorios de fontanería
fr: Fixations et supports de plomberie
it: Supporti e raccordi per tubi
ja: 配管部品
nl: Loodgietersbenodigdheden
no: Rørbeslag
pl: Mocowania hydrauliczne
pt: Juntas e conexões para encanamento
ru: Фитинги и крепления для труб
sv: Rördelar
tr: Sıhhi Tesisat Bağlantı Parçaları

en: Gaskets & O-Rings
xx: Gaskets & O-Rings
cs: Těsnění a o-kroužky
da: Rørpakninger
de: Dichtungen & O-Ringe
es: Juntas y juntas tóricas
fr: Joints d'étanchéité et joints toriques
it: Guarnizioni idrauliche
ja: パッキン・ガスケット
nl: Afdichtingen voor loodgieterswerk
no: Pakninger og O-ringer
pl: Uszczelki hydrauliczne
pt: Anéis de vedação
ru: Сантехнические прокладки
sv: Rörpackningar
tr: Sıhhi Tesisat Contaları ve O Halkaları

en: In-Wall Carriers & Mounting Frames
xx: In-Wall Carriers & Mounting Frames
cs: Montážní rámy a předstěnové systémy
da: Indbygningscisterner og monteringsrammer
de: In der Wand verbaute Trägerleisten
es: Bastidores y armazones de soporte para empotrado
fr: Bâti-supports
it: Telai e supporti interni alle pareti
ja: 壁埋込用フレーム
nl: Dragers en montageframes voor muurinbouw
no: Veggmonterte bærere og monteringsrammer
pl: Stelaże i uchwyty do montowania w ścianie
pt: Estruturas de montagem embutidas
ru: Скрытые балки и монтажные рамы
sv: Monteringsramar
tr: Duvara Monte Taşıyıcılar ve Montaj Askıları

en: Nozzles
xx: Nozzles
cs: Trysky
da: Dyser
de: Düsen
es: Boquillas
fr: Buses
it: Ugelli
ja: ノズル
nl: Mondstukken
no: Dyser
pl: Dysze
pt: Bocais
ru: Патрубки
sv: Munstycken
tr: Hortum Başları

en: Pipe Adapters & Bushings
xx: Pipe Adapters & Bushings
cs: Redukce na potrubí
da: Røradaptere og bøsninger
de: Rohranschlüsse & Reduzierstücke
es: Adaptadores de tuberías y boquillas
fr: Adaptateurs et raccords de tuyauterie
it: Adattatori e boccole tubi
ja: パイプアダプター・ブッシング
nl: Buisverbindings- en koppelstukken
no: Røradaptere og bøssinger
pl: Przejściówki i łączniki hydrauliczne
pt: Adaptadores e buchas para encanamento
ru: Переходники и втулки для труб
sv: Rörbussningar och övergångsnipplar
tr: Boru Adaptörleri ve Burçları

en: Pipe Caps & Plugs
xx: Pipe Caps & Plugs
cs: Krytky a zátky na potrubí
da: Rørhætter og -propper
de: Rohrkappen & -verschlüsse
es: Tapones de tuberías
fr: Bouchons mâles et femelles
it: Cappucci e tappi per tubi
ja: パイプ用キャップ・栓
nl: Afdichtstoppen en -pluggen
no: Rørhetter og -plugger
pl: Nasadki i zaślepki na rury
pt: Tampões e bujões para encanamento
ru: Колпачки и заглушки для труб
sv: Rörhuvar och rörpluggar
tr: Boru Tapaları ve Tıkaçları

en: Pipe Connectors
xx: Pipe Connectors
cs: Spojky na potrubí
da: Rørforbindere
de: Rohrverbinder
es: Conectores de tuberías
fr: Raccords de tuyauterie
it: Raccordi tubi
ja: パイプ継手
nl: Koppelstukken
no: Rørforbindelser
pl: Złączki do rur
pt: Conectores para encanamento
ru: Разъемы для труб
sv: Rörkopplingar
tr: Boru Bağlantı Elemanları

en: Plumbing Flanges
xx: Plumbing Flanges
cs: Instalatérské příruby
da: Studser
de: Rohrflansche
es: Bridas para fontanería
fr: Colliers de serrage de plomberie
it: Flange idrauliche
ja: フランジ
nl: Flenzen voor loodgieterswerk
no: Rørflenser
pl: Kołnierze hydrauliczne
pt: Flanges para válvulas de escoamento
ru: Сантехнические фланцы
sv: Rörflänsar
tr: Boru Flanşları

en: Plumbing Pipe Clamps
xx: Plumbing Pipe Clamps
cs: Spony na potrubí
da: Rørtvinger
de: Rohrschellen
es: Abrazaderas de tuberías
fr: Brides de fixation de plomberie
it: Morsetti per tubi
ja: パイプクランプ
nl: Buisklemmen voor loodgieterswerk
no: Rørklemmer
pl: Zaciski na rury
pt: Abraçadeiras para encanamento
ru: Хомуты для сантехнических труб
sv: Rörklämmor
tr: Boru Kelepçeleri

en: Plumbing Regulators
xx: Plumbing Regulators
cs: Instalatérské regulátory
da: Sanitetsregulatorer
de: Druckminderer
es: Reguladores de fontanería
fr: Régulateurs de plomberie
it: Regolatori idraulici
ja: 水圧調整レギュレータ
nl: Afvoerbegrenzers
no: Avløpsregulatorer
pl: Regulatory hydrauliczne
pt: Reguladores para encanamento
ru: Регулирующая водопроводная арматура
sv: Rörregulatorer
tr: Sıhhi Tesisat Regülatörleri

en: Plumbing Valves
xx: Plumbing Valves
cs: Instalatérské ventily
da: Rørventiler
de: Ventile
es: Válvulas de fontanería
fr: Soupapes de plomberie
it: Valvole idrauliche
ja: 配管バルブ
nl: Leidingkranen
no: Rørventiler
pl: Zawory hydrauliczne
pt: Registros para encanamento
ru: Водопроводные вентили
sv: Rörventiler
tr: Sıhhi Tesisat Vanaları

en: Plumbing Fixture Hardware & Parts
xx: Plumbing Fixture Hardware & Parts
cs: Instalatérské potřeby a součástky
da: Dele til sanitære installationer
de: Zubehör für sanitäre Anlagen
es: Piezas y herramientas para componentes de fontanería
fr: Pièces et matériel de plomberie
it: Ferramenta per la riparazione di impianti idraulici
ja: 配管固定具・パーツ
nl: Onderdelen voor sanitair
no: Blandebatterier og deler
pl: Armatura wodociągowa i części
pt: Peças e ferragens para fixação de encanamento
ru: Сантехнические принадлежности
sv: Vattenkransutrustning och -delar
tr: Su Tahliye Teçhizatı ve Parçaları

en: Bathtub Accessories
xx: Bathtub Accessories
cs: Vanové doplňky
da: Badekar – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Badewannen
es: Accesorios de bañera
fr: Accessoires pour baignoires
it: Accessori vasche da bagno
ja: バスタブ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor badkuipen
no: Badekartilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do wanien
pt: Acessórios para banheiras
ru: Принадлежности для ванн
sv: Badkarstillbehör
tr: Küvet Aksesuarları

en: Bathtub Bases & Feet
xx: Bathtub Bases & Feet
cs: Vanové nožky a podstavy
da: Fundamenter og fødder til badekar
de: Badewannenunterbau & -füße
es: Patas y bases para bañeras
fr: Supports et pieds pour baignoires
it: Piedini e basi per vasche da bagno
ja: バスタブの台座・脚
nl: Badkuipsteunen en -ombouw
no: Badekarsokler og -føtter
pl: Podstawki i nóżki do wanien
pt: Bases e suportes para banheiras
ru: Каркасы и ножки для ванн
sv: Badkarssocklar och -fötter
tr: Küvet Tabanları ve Ayakları